Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2096HV (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 961 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. Subtract, to the extent included, 3 up to five hundred thousand dollars of a nonqualified deferred 4 compensation plan or any earnings attributable to the 5 nonqualified deferred compensation plan received by a person 6 who is any of the following: 7 (1) Disabled. 8 (2) Fifty-five years of age or older. 9 (3) The surviving spouse of an individual or a survivor 10 having an insurable interest in an individual who would have 11 qualified for the exemption under this subsection for the tax 12 year. 13 b. Married taxpayers who file separate state income tax 14 returns shall allocate their combined annual exclusion amount 15 to each spouse in the proportion that each spouseâs respective 16 income received from a nonqualified deferred compensation plan 17 bears to the total combined pension or retirement pay received. 18 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 19 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 20 or after that date. 21